Ohio, session 136, HB476.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 109.32, 2915.01, 2915.07, 2915.08, 2915.081, 2915.082, 2915.092, 2915.093, 2915.10, 2915.101, and 2915.14 be amended; section 2915.092 (2915.16) be amended for the purpose of adopting a new section number as indicated in parentheses; and sections 2915.17, 2915.18, 2915.19, and 2915.20 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 109.32. (A) All annual filing fees obtained by the attorney general pursuant to section 109.31 of the Revised Code, all receipts obtained from the sale of the charitable foundations directory, all registration fees received by the attorney general, bond forfeitures, awards of costs and attorney's fees, and civil penalties assessed under Chapter 1716. of the Revised Code, all license fees received by the attorney general under section 2915.08, 2915.081, or 2915.082 of the Revised Code, all fees received by the attorney general under section 2915.15 of the Revised Code, all registration and license fees received by the attorney general under sections 2915.17 and 2915.18 of the Revised Code, and all filing fees received by the attorney general under divisions (F) and (G) of section 2915.02 of the Revised Code, shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the charitable law fund. (B)(1) Except as otherwise provided in divisions (B)(2) and (3) of this section, the charitable law fund shall be used insofar as its moneys are available for the expenses of the charitable law section of the office of the attorney general. (2) All annual license fees that are received by the attorney general under section 2915.08, 2915.081, or 2915.082 of the Revised Code, all registration and license fees received by the attorney general under sections 2915.17 and 2915.18 of the Revised Code, and all filing fees received by the attorney general under divisions (F) and (G) of section 2915.02 of the Revised Code, that are credited to the fund shall be used by the attorney general, or any law enforcement agency in cooperation with the attorney general, for the purposes specified in division (H) of section 2915.10 of the Revised Code and to administer and enforce Chapter 2915. of the Revised Code. (3) All fees received by the attorney general under section 2915.15 of the Revised Code that are credited to the fund shall be used for the purposes specified in that section. (C) The expenses of the charitable law section in excess of moneys available in the charitable law fund shall be paid out of regular appropriations to the office of the attorney general. Sec. 2915.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Bookmaking" means the business of receiving or paying off bets. (B) "Bet" means the hazarding of anything of value upon the result of an event, undertaking, or contingency, but does not include a bona fide business risk. (C) "Scheme of chance" means a slot machine unless authorized under Chapter 3772. of the Revised Code, lottery unless authorized under Chapter 3770. of the Revised Code, numbers game, pool conducted for profit, or other scheme in which a participant gives a valuable consideration for a chance to win a prize, but does not include bingo, a skill-based amusement machine, or a pool not conducted for profit. "Scheme of chance" includes the use of an electronic device to reveal the results of a game entry if valuable consideration is paid, directly or indirectly, for a chance to win a prize. Valuable consideration is deemed to be paid for a chance to win a prize in the following instances: (1) Less than fifty per cent of the goods or services sold by a scheme of chance operator in exchange for game entries are used or redeemed by participants at any one location; (2) Less than fifty per cent of participants who purchase goods or services at any one location do not accept, use, or redeem the goods or services sold or purportedly sold; (3) More than fifty per cent of prizes at any one location are revealed to participants through an electronic device simulating a game of chance or a "casino game" as defined in section 3772.01 of the Revised Code; (4) The good or service sold by a scheme of chance operator in exchange for a game entry cannot be used or redeemed in the manner advertised; (5) A participant pays more than fair market value for goods or services offered by a scheme of chance operator in order to receive one or more game entries; (6) A participant may use the electronic device to purchase additional game entries; (7) A participant may purchase additional game entries by using points or credits won as prizes while using the electronic device; (8) A scheme of chance operator pays out in prize money more than twenty per cent of the gross revenue received at one location; or (9) A participant makes a purchase or exchange in order to obtain any good or service that may be used to facilitate play on the electronic device. As used in this division, "electronic device" means a mechanical, video, digital, or electronic machine or device that is capable of displaying information on a screen or other mechanism and that is owned, leased, or otherwise possessed by any person conducting a scheme of chance, or by that person's partners, affiliates, subsidiaries, or contractors. "Electronic device" does not include an electronic instant bingo system or an online raffle platform. (D) "Game of chance" means poker, craps, roulette, or other game in which a player gives anything of value in the hope of gain, the outcome of which is determined largely by chance, but does not include bingo. (E) "Game of chance conducted for profit" means any game of chance designed to produce income for the person who conducts or operates the game of chance, but does not include bingo. (F) "Gambling device" means any of the following: (1) A book, totalizer, or other equipment for recording bets; (2) A ticket, token, or other device representing a chance, share, or interest in a scheme of chance or evidencing a bet; (3) A deck of cards, dice, gaming table, roulette wheel, slot machine, or other apparatus designed for use in connection with a game of chance; (4) Any equipment, device, apparatus, or paraphernalia specially designed for gambling purposes; (5) Bingo supplies sold or otherwise provided, or used, in violation of this chapter. (G) "Gambling offense" means any of the following: (1) A violation of this chapter; (2) A violation of an existing or former municipal ordinance or law of this or any other state or the United States substantially equivalent to any provision of this chapter or a violation of section 2915.06 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 1, 1996; (3) An offense under an existing or former municipal ordinance or law of this or any other state or the United States, of which gambling is an element; (4) A conspiracy or attempt to commit, or complicity in committing, any offense under division (G)(1), (2), or (3) of this section. (H) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, "charitable organization" means either of the following: (1) An organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; (2) A volunteer rescue service organization, volunteer firefighter's organization, veteran's organization, fraternal organization, or sporting organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(4), (c)(7), (c)(8), (c)(10), or (c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code. To qualify as a "charitable organization," an organization shall have been in continuous existence as such in this state for a period of two years immediately preceding either the making of an application for a bingo license under section 2915.08 of the Revised Code or the conducting of any game of chance as provided in division (D) of section 2915.02 of the Revised Code. (I) "Religious organization" means any church, body of communicants, or group that is not organized or operated for profit and that gathers in common membership for regular worship and religious observances. (J) "Veteran's organization" means any individual post or state headquarters of a national veteran's association or an auxiliary unit of any individual post of a national veteran's association, which post, state headquarters, or auxiliary unit is incorporated as a nonprofit corporation and either has received a letter from the state headquarters of the national veteran's association indicating that the individual post or auxiliary unit is in good standing with the national veteran's association or has received a letter from the national veteran's association indicating that the state headquarters is in good standing with the national veteran's association. As used in this division, "national veteran's association" means any veteran's association that has been in continuous existence as such for a period of at least five years and either is incorporated by an act of the United States congress or has a national dues-paying membership of at least five thousand persons. (K) "Volunteer firefighter's organization" means any organization of volunteer firefighters, as defined in section 146.01 of the Revised Code, that is organized and operated exclusively to provide financial support for a volunteer fire department or a volunteer fire company and that is recognized or ratified by a county, municipal corporation, or township, or district. (L) "Fraternal organization" means any society, order, state headquarters, or association within this state, except a college or high school fraternity, that is not organized for profit, that is a branch, lodge, or chapter of a national or state organization, that exists exclusively for the common business or sodality of its members. (M) "Volunteer rescue service organization" means any organization of volunteers organized to function as an emergency medical service organization, as defined in section 4765.01 of the Revised Code. (N) "Charitable bingo game" means any bingo game described in division (O)(1) or (2) of this section that is conducted by a charitable organization that has obtained a license pursuant to section 2915.08 of the Revised Code and the proceeds of which are used for a charitable purpose. (O) "Bingo" means either of the following: (1) A game with all of the following characteristics: (a) The participants use bingo cards or sheets, including paper formats and electronic representation or image formats, that are divided into twenty-five spaces arranged in five horizontal and five vertical rows of spaces, with each space, except the central space, being designated by a combination of a letter and a number and with the central space being designated as a free space. (b) The participants cover the spaces on the bingo cards or sheets that correspond to combinations of letters and numbers that are announced by a bingo game operator. (c) A bingo game operator announces combinations of letters and numbers that appear on objects that a bingo game operator selects by chance, either manually or mechanically, from a receptacle that contains seventy-five objects at the beginning of each game, each object marked by a different combination of a letter and a number that corresponds to one of the seventy-five possible combinations of a letter and a number that can appear on the bingo cards or sheets. (d) The winner of the bingo game includes any participant who properly announces during the interval between the announcements of letters and numbers as described in division (O)(1)(c) of this section, that a predetermined and preannounced pattern of spaces has been covered on a bingo card or sheet being used by the participant. (2) Instant bingo, electronic instant bingo, and raffles. (P) "Conduct" means to back, promote, organize, manage, carry on, sponsor, or prepare for the operation of bingo or a game of chance, a scheme of chance, or a sweepstakes. (Q) "Bingo game operator" means any person, except security personnel, who performs work or labor at the site of bingo, including, but not limited to, collecting money from participants, handing out bingo cards or sheets or objects to cover spaces on bingo cards or sheets, selecting from a receptacle the objects that contain the combination of letters and numbers that appear on bingo cards or sheets, calling out the combinations of letters and numbers, distributing prizes, selling or redeeming instant bingo tickets or cards, selling or redeeming electronic instant bingo tickets, credits, or vouchers, accessing an electronic instant bingo system other than as a participant, supervising the operation of a punch board, selling raffle tickets, selecting raffle tickets from a receptacle and announcing the winning numbers in a raffle, and preparing, selling, and serving food or beverages. "Bingo game operator" does not include a person who is installing, maintaining, updating, or repairing an electronic instant bingo system or a person who operates an online raffle platform. (R) "Participant" means any person who plays bingo. (S) "Bingo session" means a period that includes both of the following: (1) Not to exceed five continuous hours for the conduct of one or more games described in division (O)(1) of this section, instant bingo, and electronic instant bingo; (2) A period for the conduct of instant bingo and electronic instant bingo for not more than two hours before and not more than two hours after the period described in division (S)(1) of this section. (T) "Gross receipts" means all money or assets, including admission fees, that a person receives from bingo without the deduction of any amounts for prizes paid out or for the expenses of conducting bingo. "Gross receipts" does not include any money directly taken in from the sale of food or beverages by a charitable organization conducting bingo, or by a bona fide auxiliary unit or society of a charitable organization conducting bingo, provided all of the following apply: (1) The auxiliary unit or society has been in existence as a bona fide auxiliary unit or society of the charitable organization for at least two years prior to conducting bingo. (2) The person who purchases the food or beverage receives nothing of value except the food or beverage and items customarily received with the purchase of that food or beverage. (3) The food and beverages are sold at customary and reasonable prices. (U) "Security personnel" includes any person who either is a sheriff, deputy sheriff, marshal, deputy marshal, township constable, or member of an organized police department of a municipal corporation or has successfully completed a peace officer's training course pursuant to sections 109.71 to 109.79 of the Revised Code and who is hired to provide security for the premises on which bingo is conducted. (V) "Charitable purpose" means that the net profit of bingo, other than instant bingo or electronic instant bingo, is used by, or is given, donated, or otherwise transferred to, any of the following: (1) Any organization that is described in subsection 509(a)(1), 509(a)(2), or 509(a)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and is either a governmental unit or an organization that is tax exempt under subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; (2) A veteran's organization that is a post, chapter, or organization of veterans, or an auxiliary unit or society of, or a trust or foundation for, any such post, chapter, or organization organized in the United States or any of its possessions, at least seventy-five per cent of the members of which are veterans and substantially all of the other members of which are individuals who are spouses, widows, or widowers of veterans, or such individuals, provided that no part of the net earnings of such post, chapter, or organization inures to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual, and further provided that the net profit is used by the post, chapter, or organization for the charitable purposes set forth in division (B)(12) of section 5739.02 of the Revised Code, is used for awarding scholarships to or for attendance at an institution mentioned in division (B)(12) of section 5739.02 of the Revised Code, is donated to a governmental agency, or is used for nonprofit youth activities, the purchase of United States or Ohio flags that are donated to schools, youth groups, or other bona fide nonprofit organizations, promotion of patriotism, or disaster relief; (3) A fraternal organization that has been in continuous existence in this state for fifteen years and that uses the net profit exclusively for religious, charitable, scientific, literary, or educational purposes, or for the prevention of cruelty to children or animals, if contributions for such use would qualify as a deductible charitable contribution under subsection 170 of the Internal Revenue Code; (4) A volunteer firefighter's organization that uses the net profit for the purposes set forth in division (K) of this section. (W) "Internal Revenue Code" means the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 100 Stat. 2085, 26 U.S.C. 1, as now or hereafter amended. (X) "Youth athletic organization" means any organization, not organized for profit, that is organized and operated exclusively to provide financial support to, or to operate, athletic activities for persons who are twenty-one years of age or younger by means of sponsoring, organizing, operating, or contributing to the support of an athletic team, club, league, or association. (Y) "Youth athletic park organization" means any organization, not organized for profit, that satisfies both of the following: (1) It owns, operates, and maintains playing fields that satisfy both of the following: (a) The playing fields are used for athletic activities by one or more organizations, not organized for profit, each of which is organized and operated exclusively to provide financial support to, or to operate, athletic activities for persons who are eighteen years of age or younger by means of sponsoring, organizing, operating, or contributing to the support of an athletic team, club, league, or association. (b) The playing fields are not used for any profit-making activity at any time during the year. (2) It uses the proceeds of bingo it conducts exclusively for the operation, maintenance, and improvement of its playing fields of the type described in division (Y)(1) of this section. (Z) (Z)(1) "Bingo supplies" means bingo cards or sheets; instant bingo tickets or cards; electronic bingo aids; raffle tickets; punch boards; seal cards; instant bingo ticket dispensers; electronic instant bingo systems; online raffle platforms; and devices for selecting or displaying the combination of bingo letters and numbers or raffle tickets. Items (2) "Bingo supplies" does not include physical tickets or other equipment used to conduct a traditional raffle. (3) Items that are "bingo supplies" are not gambling devices if sold or otherwise provided, and used, in accordance with this chapter. For (4) For purposes of this chapter, "bingo supplies" are not to be considered equipment used to conduct a bingo game. (AA) "Instant bingo" means a form of bingo that shall use folded or banded tickets or paper cards with perforated break-open tabs, a face of which is covered or otherwise hidden from view to conceal a number, letter, or symbol, or set of numbers, letters, or symbols, some of which have been designated in advance as prize winners, and may also include games in which some winners are determined by the random selection of one or more bingo numbers by the use of a seal card or bingo blower. "Instant bingo" also includes a punch board game. In all "instant bingo" the prize amount and structure shall be predetermined. "Instant bingo" does not include electronic instant bingo or any device that is activated by the insertion of a coin, currency, token, or an equivalent, and that contains as one of its components a video display monitor that is capable of displaying numbers, letters, symbols, or characters in winning or losing combinations. (BB) "Seal card" means a form of instant bingo that uses instant bingo tickets in conjunction with a board or placard that contains one or more seals that, when removed or opened, reveal predesignated winning numbers, letters, or symbols. (CC) (CC)(1) "Raffle" means a form of bingo in which the one or more prizes are won by one or more persons who have purchased a raffle ticket. The A raffle is conducted by one of the following methods: (a) As a "traditional raffle," which means a raffle conducted by selling physical tickets to participants, then determining one or more winners of the raffle are determined by drawing a ticket stub or other detachable section from a receptacle containing ticket stubs or detachable sections corresponding to all tickets sold for the raffle. "Raffle" (b) As an "online raffle," which means a raffle conducted by selling electronic representations of tickets to participants by means of an online raffle platform, with each ticket containing a unique identifier assigned by the platform, then determining one or more winners of the raffle by having the platform randomly select a unique ticket identifier from all tickets sold for the raffle. (2) "Online raffle platform" means an internet web site, application, or electronic service used to conduct an online raffle. (3) "Raffle" does not include the drawing selection of a ticket stub or other detachable section of a ticket purchased to attend a professional sporting event if both of the following apply: (1) (a) The ticket or ticket identifier stub or other detachable section is used to select the winner of a free prize given away at the professional sporting event; and (2) (b) The cost of the ticket is the same as the cost of a ticket to the professional sporting event on days when no free prize is given away. (DD) "Punch board" means a form of instant bingo that uses a board containing a number of holes or receptacles of uniform size in which are placed, mechanically and randomly, serially numbered slips of paper that may be punched or drawn from the hole or receptacle. A player may punch or draw the numbered slips of paper from the holes or receptacles and obtain the prize established for the game if the number drawn corresponds to a winning number or, if the punch board includes the use of a seal card, a potential winning number. (EE) "Gross profit" means gross receipts minus the amount actually expended for the payment of prize awards. (FF) "Net profit" means gross profit minus expenses. (GG) "Expenses" means the reasonable amount of gross profit actually expended for all of the following: (1) The purchase or lease of bingo supplies; (2) The annual license or registration fee required under section 2915.08, 2915.17, or 2915.18 of the Revised Code; (3) Bank fees and service charges for a bingo session or game account described in section 2915.10 of the Revised Code; (4) Audits and accounting services; (5) Safes; (6) Cash registers; (7) Hiring security personnel; (8) Advertising bingo; (9) Renting premises in which to conduct a bingo session; (10) Tables and chairs; (11) Expenses for maintaining and operating a charitable organization's facilities, including, but not limited to, a post home, club house, lounge, tavern, or canteen and any grounds attached to the post home, club house, lounge, tavern, or canteen; (12) Payment of real property taxes and assessments that are levied on a premises on which bingo is conducted; (13) Any other product or service directly related to the conduct of bingo that is authorized in rules adopted by the attorney general under division (F)(1) of section 2915.08 of the Revised Code. (HH) "Person" has the same meaning as in section 1.59 of the Revised Code and includes any firm or any other legal entity, however organized. (II) "Revoke" means to void permanently all rights and privileges of the holder of a license issued under section 2915.08, 2915.081, or 2915.082 of the Revised Code or a charitable gaming license issued by another jurisdiction. (JJ) "Suspend" means to interrupt temporarily all rights and privileges of the holder of a license issued under section 2915.08, 2915.081, or 2915.082 of the Revised Code or a charitable gaming license issued by another jurisdiction. (KK) "Distributor" means any person who purchases or obtains bingo supplies and who does either of the following: (1) Sells, offers for sale, or otherwise provides or offers to provide the bingo supplies to another person for use in this state; (2) Modifies, converts, adds to, or removes parts from the bingo supplies to further their promotion or sale for use in this state. (LL) "Manufacturer" means any person who assembles completed bingo supplies from raw materials, other items, or subparts or who modifies, converts, adds to, or removes parts from bingo supplies to further their promotion or sale. (MM) "Gross annual revenues" means the annual gross receipts derived from the conduct of bingo described in division (O)(1) of this section plus the annual net profit derived from the conduct of bingo described in division (O)(2) of this section. (NN) "Instant bingo ticket dispenser" means a mechanical device that dispenses an instant bingo ticket or card as the sole item of value dispensed and that has the following characteristics: (1) It is activated upon the insertion of United States currency. (2) It performs no gaming functions. (3) It does not contain a video display monitor or generate noise. (4) It is not capable of displaying any numbers, letters, symbols, or characters in winning or losing combinations. (5) It does not simulate or display rolling or spinning reels. (6) It is incapable of determining whether a dispensed bingo ticket or card is a winning or nonwinning ticket or card and requires a winning ticket or card to be paid by a bingo game operator. (7) It may provide accounting and security features to aid in accounting for the instant bingo tickets or cards it dispenses. (8) It is not part of an electronic network and is not interactive. (OO)(1) "Electronic bingo aid" means an electronic device used by a participant to monitor bingo cards or sheets purchased at the time and place of a bingo session and that does all of the following: (a) It provides a means for a participant to input numbers and letters announced by a bingo caller. (b) It compares the numbers and letters entered by the participant to the bingo faces previously stored in the memory of the device. (c) It identifies a winning bingo pattern. (2) "Electronic bingo aid" does not include any device into which a coin, currency, token, or an equivalent is inserted to activate play. (PP) "Deal" means a single game of instant bingo tickets, or a single game of electronic instant bingo tickets, all with the same serial number. (QQ)(1) "Slot machine" means either of the following: (a) Any mechanical, electronic, video, or digital device that is capable of accepting anything of value, directly or indirectly, from or on behalf of a player who gives the thing of value in the hope of gain; (b) Any mechanical, electronic, video, or digital device that is capable of accepting anything of value, directly or indirectly, from or on behalf of a player to conduct bingo or a scheme or game of chance. (2) "Slot machine" does not include a skill-based amusement machine, an instant bingo ticket dispenser, or an electronic instant bingo system, or an online raffle platform. (RR) "Net profit from the proceeds of the sale of instant bingo or , electronic instant bingo, or online raffles" means gross profit minus the ordinary, necessary, and reasonable expense expended for the purchase of bingo supplies for the purpose of conducting instant bingo or , electronic instant bingo, or online raffles and, in the case of instant bingo or , electronic instant bingo, or online raffles conducted by a veteran's, fraternal, or sporting organization or an entity described in division (A)(1)(c) of section 2915.16 of the Revised Code, minus the payment by that organization or entity of real property taxes and assessments levied on a premises on which instant bingo or , electronic instant bingo is , or online raffles are conducted. (SS) "Charitable instant bingo organization" means an organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and is a charitable organization as defined in this section. A "charitable instant bingo organization" does not include a charitable organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that is created by a veteran's organization, a fraternal organization, or a sporting organization in regards to bingo conducted or assisted by a veteran's organization, a fraternal organization, or a sporting organization pursuant to section 2915.13 of the Revised Code. (TT) "Game flare" means the board or placard, or electronic representation of a board or placard, that accompanies each deal of instant bingo or electronic instant bingo tickets and that includes the following information for the game: (1) The name of the game; (2) The manufacturer's name or distinctive logo; (3) The form number; (4) The ticket count; (5) The prize structure, including the number of winning tickets by denomination and the respective winning symbol or number combinations for the winning tickets; (6) The cost per play; (7) The serial number of the game. (UU)(1) "Skill-based amusement machine" means a mechanical, video, digital, or electronic device that rewards the player or players, if at all, only with merchandise prizes or with redeemable vouchers redeemable only for merchandise prizes, provided that with respect to rewards for playing the game all of the following apply: (a) The wholesale value of a merchandise prize awarded as a result of the single play of a machine does not exceed ten dollars; (b) Redeemable vouchers awarded for any single play of a machine are not redeemable for a merchandise prize with a wholesale value of more than ten dollars; (c) Redeemable vouchers are not redeemable for a merchandise prize that has a wholesale value of more than ten dollars times the fewest number of single plays necessary to accrue the redeemable vouchers required to obtain that prize; and (d) Any redeemable vouchers or merchandise prizes are distributed at the site of the skill-based amusement machine at the time of play. A card for the purchase of gasoline is a redeemable voucher for purposes of division (UU)(1) of this section even if the skill-based amusement machine for the play of which the card is awarded is located at a place where gasoline may not be legally distributed to the public or the card is not redeemable at the location of, or at the time of playing, the skill-based amusement machine. (2) A device shall not be considered a skill-based amusement machine and shall be considered a slot machine if it pays cash or one or more of the following apply: (a) The ability of a player to succeed at the game is impacted by the number or ratio of prior wins to prior losses of players playing the game. (b) Any reward of redeemable vouchers is not based solely on the player achieving the object of the game or the player's score; (c) The outcome of the game, or the value of the redeemable voucher or merchandise prize awarded for winning the game, can be controlled by a source other than any player playing the game. (d) The success of any player is or may be determined by a chance event that cannot be altered by player actions. (e) The ability of any player to succeed at the game is determined by game features not visible or known to the player. (f) The ability of the player to succeed at the game is impacted by the exercise of a skill that no reasonable player could exercise. (3) All of the following apply to any machine that is operated as described in division (UU)(1) of this section: (a) As used in division (UU) of this section, "game" and "play" mean one event from the initial activation of the machine until the results of play are determined without payment of additional consideration. An individual utilizing a machine that involves a single game, play, contest, competition, or tournament may be awarded redeemable vouchers or merchandise prizes based on the results of play. (b) Advance play for a single game, play, contest, competition, or tournament participation may be purchased. The cost of the contest, competition, or tournament participation may be greater than a single noncontest, competition, or tournament play. (c) To the extent that the machine is used in a contest, competition, or tournament, that contest, competition, or tournament has a defined starting and ending date and is open to participants in competition for scoring and ranking results toward the awarding of redeemable vouchers or merchandise prizes that are stated prior to the start of the contest, competition, or tournament. (4) For purposes of division (UU)(1) of this section, the mere presence of a device, such as a pin-setting, ball-releasing, or scoring mechanism, that does not contribute to or affect the outcome of the play of the game does not make the device a skill-based amusement machine. (VV) "Merchandise prize" means any item of value, but shall not include any of the following: (1) Cash, gift cards, or any equivalent thereof; (2) Plays on games of chance, state lottery tickets, or bingo; (3) Firearms, tobacco, or alcoholic beverages; or (4) A redeemable voucher that is redeemable for any of the items listed in division (VV)(1), (2), or (3) of this section. (WW) "Redeemable voucher" means any ticket, token, coupon, receipt, or other noncash representation of value. (XX) "Pool not conducted for profit" means a scheme in which a participant gives a valuable consideration for a chance to win a prize and the total amount of consideration wagered is distributed to a participant or participants. (YY) "Sporting organization" means a hunting, fishing, or trapping organization, other than a college or high school fraternity or sorority, that is not organized for profit, that is affiliated with a state or national sporting organization, including but not limited to, the league of Ohio sportsmen, and that has been in continuous existence in this state for a period of three years. (ZZ) "Community action agency" has the same meaning as in section 5101.311 of the Revised Code. (AAA)(1) "Sweepstakes terminal device" means a mechanical, video, digital, or electronic machine or device that is owned, leased, or otherwise possessed by any person conducting a sweepstakes, or by that person's partners, affiliates, subsidiaries, or contractors, that is intended to be used by a sweepstakes participant, and that is capable of displaying information on a screen or other mechanism. A device is a sweepstakes terminal device if any of the following apply: (a) The device uses a simulated game terminal as a representation of the prizes associated with the results of the sweepstakes entries. (b) The device utilizes software such that the simulated game influences or determines the winning of or value of the prize. (c) The device selects prizes from a predetermined finite pool of entries. (d) The device utilizes a mechanism that reveals the content of a predetermined sweepstakes entry. (e) The device predetermines the prize results and stores those results for delivery at the time the sweepstakes entry results are revealed. (f) The device utilizes software to create a game result. (g) The device reveals the prize incrementally, even though the device does not influence the awarding of the prize or the value of any prize awarded. (h) The device determines and associates the prize with an entry or entries at the time the sweepstakes is entered. (2) As used in this division and in section 2915.02 of the Revised Code: (a) "Enter" means the act by which a person becomes eligible to receive any prize offered in a sweepstakes. (b) "Entry" means one event from the initial activation of the sweepstakes terminal device until all the sweepstakes prize results from that activation are revealed. (c) "Prize" means any gift, award, gratuity, good, service, credit, reward, or any other thing of value that may be transferred to a person, whether possession of the prize is actually transferred, or placed on an account or other record as evidence of the intent to transfer the prize. (d) "Sweepstakes terminal device facility" means any location in this state where a sweepstakes terminal device is provided to a sweepstakes participant, except as provided in division (G) of section 2915.02 of the Revised Code. (BBB) "Sweepstakes" means any game, contest, advertising scheme or plan, or other promotion where consideration is not required for a person to enter to win or become eligible to receive any prize, the determination of which is based upon chance. "Sweepstakes" does not include bingo as authorized under this chapter, pari-mutuel wagering as authorized by Chapter 3769. of the Revised Code, lotteries conducted by the state lottery commission as authorized by Chapter 3770. of the Revised Code, and casino gaming as authorized by Chapter 3772. of the Revised Code. (CCC)(1) "Electronic instant bingo" means a form of bingo that consists of an electronic or digital representation of instant bingo in which a participant wins a prize if the participant's electronic instant bingo ticket contains a combination of numbers or symbols that was designated in advance as a winning combination, and to which all of the following apply: (a) Each deal has a predetermined, finite number of winning and losing tickets and a predetermined prize amount and deal structure, provided that there may be multiple winning combinations in each deal and multiple winning tickets. (b) Each electronic instant bingo ticket within a deal has a unique serial number that is not regenerated. (c) Each electronic instant bingo ticket within a deal is sold for the same price. (d) After a participant purchases an electronic instant bingo ticket, the combination of numbers or symbols on the ticket is revealed to the participant. (e) The reveal of numbers or symbols on the ticket may incorporate an entertainment or bonus theme, provided that the reveal does not include spinning reels that resemble a slot machine. (f) The reveal theme, if any, does not require additional consideration or award any prize other than any predetermined prize associated with the electronic instant bingo ticket. (2) "Electronic instant bingo" shall not include any of the following: (a) Any game, entertainment, or bonus theme that replicates or simulates any of the following: (i) The gambling games of keno, blackjack, roulette, poker, craps, other casino-style table games; (ii) Horse racing; (iii) Gambling games offered in this state on slot machines or video lottery terminals. As used in this division, "video lottery terminal" has the same meaning as in section 3770.21 of the Revised Code. (b) Any device operated by dropping one or more coins or tokens into a slot and pulling a handle or pushing a button or touchpoint on a touchscreen to activate one to three or more rotating reels marked into horizontal segments by varying symbols, where the predetermined prize amount depends on how and how many of the symbols line up when the rotating reels come to a rest; (c) Any device that includes a coin or token slot, tray, or hopper and the ability to dispense coins, cash, tokens, or anything of value other than a credit ticket voucher. (DDD) "Electronic instant bingo system" means both of the following: (1) A mechanical, electronic, digital, or video device and associated software to which all of the following apply: (a) It is used by not more than one player at a time to play electronic instant bingo on a single screen that is physically connected to the device; (b) It is located on the premises of the principal place of business of a veteran's or fraternal organization that holds a type II or type III bingo license to conduct electronic instant bingo at that location issued under section 2915.08 of the Revised Code. (2) Any associated equipment or software used to manage, monitor, or document any aspect of electronic instant bingo. Sec. 2915.07. (A) No Except as otherwise permitted by section 2915.16 of the Revised Code, no person or entity, except a charitable organization that has obtained a license pursuant to section 2915.08 of the Revised Code, shall conduct or advertise bingo. This division does not apply to a raffle that a charitable organization conducts or advertises. (B) Whoever violates this section is guilty of conducting illegal bingo, a felony of the fourth degree. Sec. 2915.08. (A)(1) Except as otherwise permitted under section 2915.092 2915.16 of the Revised Code, annually before the first day of January, a charitable organization that desires to conduct bingo shall apply to the attorney general for one or more of the following types of licenses to conduct bingo, as appropriate: (a) A type I license to conduct bingo as described in division (O)(1) of section 2915.01 of the Revised Code; (b) A type II license to conduct instant bingo, electronic instant bingo, or both at a bingo session; (c) A type III license to conduct instant bingo, electronic instant bingo, or both other than at a bingo session, in accordance with sections 2915.093 to 2915.095 or sections 2915.13 to 2915.15 of the Revised Code, as applicable. (2) A veteran's organization or fraternal organization that is authorized under section 2915.14 of the Revised Code to conduct electronic instant bingo may be issued only one license to conduct electronic instant bingo at any one time. The organization may conduct electronic instant bingo under that license at only one location specified on the license, which shall be the organization's principal place of business. (B) The application shall be accompanied by a license fee as follows: (1) If the charitable organization was not licensed to conduct bingo under this chapter before July 1, 2003, a fee established by the attorney general by rule adopted pursuant to section 111.15 of the Revised Code. (2) If the charitable organization was licensed to conduct bingo under this chapter before July 1, 2003, the following applicable fee: (a) For a type I license for a charitable organization that wishes to conduct bingo during twenty-six or more weeks in any calendar year, a license fee of two hundred dollars; (b) For a type II or type III license for a charitable organization that previously has not been licensed under this chapter to conduct instant bingo or electronic instant bingo and that wishes to conduct bingo during twenty-six or more weeks in any calendar year, a license fee of five hundred dollars; (c) For a type II or type III license for a charitable organization that previously has been licensed under this chapter to conduct instant bingo or electronic instant bingo and that desires to conduct bingo during twenty-six or more weeks in any calendar year, a license fee that is based upon the gross profits received by the charitable organization from the operation of instant bingo or electronic instant bingo during the one-year period ending on the thirty-first day of October of the year immediately preceding the year for which the license is sought, and that is one of the following: (i) Five hundred dollars, if the total is fifty thousand dollars or less; (ii) One thousand two hundred fifty dollars plus one-fourth per cent of the gross profit, if the total is more than fifty thousand dollars but less than two hundred fifty thousand one dollars; (iii) Two thousand two hundred fifty dollars plus one-half per cent of the gross profit, if the total is more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars but less than five hundred thousand one dollars; (iv) Three thousand five hundred dollars plus one per cent of the gross profit, if the total is more than five hundred thousand dollars but less than one million one dollars; (v) Five thousand dollars plus one per cent of the gross profit, if the total is one million one dollars or more. (c)(d) For a type I, type II, or type III license for a charitable organization that desires to conduct bingo during fewer than twenty-six weeks in any calendar year, a reduced license fee established by the attorney general by rule adopted pursuant to section 111.15 of the Revised Code. (C) The application shall be in the form prescribed by the attorney general, shall be signed and sworn to by the applicant, and shall contain all of the following: (1) The name and post-office address of the applicant; (2) A statement that the applicant is a charitable organization and that it has been in continuous existence as a charitable organization in this state for two years immediately preceding the making of the application; (3) The location at which the organization will conduct bingo, which location shall be within the county in which the principal place of business of the applicant is located, the days of the week and the times on each of those days when bingo will be conducted, whether the organization owns, leases, or subleases the premises, and a copy of the rental agreement if it leases or subleases the premises; (4) A statement of the applicant's previous history, record, and association that is sufficient to establish that the applicant is a charitable organization, and a copy of a determination letter that is issued by the Internal Revenue Service and states that the organization is tax exempt under subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 501(c)(3), 501(c)(4), 501(c)(7), 501(c)(8), 501(c)(10), or 501(c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code; (5) A statement as to whether the applicant has ever had any previous application made under this section or section 2915.18 of the Revised Code refused, whether it previously has had a bingo or online raffle license revoked or suspended, and the reason stated by the attorney general for the refusal, revocation, or suspension; (6) A statement of the charitable purposes for which the net profit derived from bingo described in division (O)(1) of section 2915.01 of the Revised Code will be used, or a statement of how the net profit derived from instant bingo or electronic instant bingo will be distributed in accordance with section 2915.101 of the Revised Code, as applicable; (7) Other necessary and reasonable information that the attorney general may require by rule adopted pursuant to section 111.15 of the Revised Code; (8) If the applicant is a charitable trust as defined in section 109.23 of the Revised Code, a statement as to whether it has registered with the attorney general pursuant to section 109.26 of the Revised Code or filed annual reports pursuant to section 109.31 of the Revised Code, and, if it is not required to do either, the exemption in section 109.26 or 109.31 of the Revised Code that applies to it; (9) If the applicant is a charitable organization as defined in section 1716.01 of the Revised Code, a statement as to whether it has filed with the attorney general a registration statement pursuant to section 1716.02 of the Revised Code and a financial report pursuant to section 1716.04 of the Revised Code, and, if it is not required to do both, the exemption in section 1716.03 of the Revised Code that applies to it; (10) In the case of an applicant seeking to qualify as a youth athletic park organization, a statement issued by a board or body vested with authority under Chapter 755. of the Revised Code for the supervision and maintenance of recreation facilities in the territory in which the organization is located, certifying that the playing fields owned by the organization were open for use to all residents of that territory, regardless of race, color, creed, religion, sex, or national origin, for athletic activities by youth athletic organizations that do not discriminate on the basis of race, color, creed, religion, sex, or national origin, and that the fields were not used for any profit-making activity at any time during the year. That type of board or body is authorized to issue the statement upon request and shall issue the statement if it finds that the applicant's playing fields were so used. (D) The attorney general, within thirty days after receiving a timely filed application from a charitable organization that has been issued a license under this section that has not expired and has not been revoked or suspended, and that, if applicable, has not had its online raffle license revoked or suspended, shall send a temporary permit to the applicant specifying the date on which the application was filed with the attorney general and stating that, pursuant to section 119.06 of the Revised Code, the applicant may continue to conduct bingo until a new license is granted or, if the application is rejected, until fifteen days after notice of the rejection is mailed to the applicant. The temporary permit does not affect the validity of the applicant's application and does not grant any rights to the applicant except those rights specifically granted in section 119.06 of the Revised Code. The issuance of a temporary permit by the attorney general pursuant to this division does not prohibit the attorney general from rejecting the applicant's application because of acts that the applicant committed, or actions that the applicant failed to take, before or after the issuance of the temporary permit. (E) Within thirty days after receiving an initial license application from a charitable organization to conduct bingo, the attorney general shall conduct a preliminary review of the application and notify the applicant regarding any deficiencies. Once an application is deemed complete, or beginning on the thirtieth day after the application is filed, if the attorney general failed to notify the applicant of any deficiencies, the attorney general shall have an additional sixty days to conduct an investigation and either grant, grant with limits, restrictions, or probationary conditions, or deny the application based on findings established and communicated in accordance with divisions (F) and (I) of this section. As an option to granting, granting with limits, restrictions, or probationary conditions, or denying an initial license application, the attorney general may grant a temporary license and request additional time to conduct the investigation if the attorney general has cause to believe that additional time is necessary to complete the investigation and has notified the applicant in writing about the specific concerns raised during the investigation. (F)(1) The attorney general shall adopt rules to enforce sections 2915.01, 2915.02, and 2915.07 to 2915.15 2915.19 of the Revised Code to ensure that bingo is conducted in accordance with those sections and to maintain proper control over the conduct of bingo. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the rules shall be adopted pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. The attorney general shall license charitable organizations to conduct bingo in conformance with this chapter and with the licensing provisions of Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (2) If any of the following applies to an organization, the attorney general may refuse to grant a license to the organization, may revoke or suspend the organization's license, or may place limits, restrictions, or probationary conditions on the organization's license for a limited or indefinite period, as determined by the attorney general: (a) The organization fails or has failed at any time to meet any requirement of, or violates or has violated any provision of, this chapter, section 109.26, 109.31, or 1716.02, or sections 2915.07 to 2915.15 of the Revised Code, or violates or has violated any provision of sections 2915.02 or 2915.07 to 2915.13 of the Revised Code or any rule adopted by the attorney general pursuant to this chapter. (b) The organization makes or has made an incorrect or false statement that is material to the granting of the license in an application filed under this section or section 2915.17 or 2915.18 of the Revised Code. (c) The organization submits or has submitted any incorrect or false information relating to an application filed under this section or section 2915.17 or 2915.18 of the Revised Code if the information is material to the granting of the license. (d) The organization maintains or has maintained any incorrect or false information that is material to the granting of the bingo license or of an online raffle license in the records required to be kept pursuant to section 2915.10 of the Revised Code, if applicable. (e) The attorney general has good cause to believe that the organization will not conduct bingo in accordance with sections 2915.07 to 2915.15 of the Revised Code or with any rule adopted by the attorney general pursuant to this chapter. (3) If the attorney general has good cause to believe that any director or officer of the organization has breached the director's or officer's fiduciary duty to, or committed theft or any other type of misconduct related to, the organization or any other charitable organization that has been issued a bingo license under this chapter, the attorney general may refuse to grant a license to the organization, may impose limits, restrictions, or probationary conditions on the license, or may revoke or suspend the organization's license for a period not to exceed five years. (4) The attorney general may impose a civil fine on an organization licensed or permitted under this chapter for failure to comply with any restrictions, limits, or probationary conditions on its license, and for failure to comply with this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter, according to a schedule of fines that the attorney general shall adopt in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (5) For the purposes of division (F) of this section, any action of an officer, trustee, agent, representative, or bingo game operator of an organization is an action of the organization. (G) The attorney general may grant licenses to charitable organizations that are branches, lodges, or chapters of national charitable organizations. (H) The attorney general shall send notice of any of the following actions in writing to the prosecuting attorney and sheriff of the county in which the charitable organization is located and to any other law enforcement agency in that county that so requests, of all of the following: (1) The issuance of a license under this section; (2) The issuance of an amended license under this section; (3) The rejection of an application for and refusal to grant a license under this section; (4) The revocation of any license previously issued under this section; (5) The suspension of any license previously issued under this section; (6) The placing of any limits, restrictions, or probationary conditions placed on a license issued under this section. (I) A license issued by the attorney general under this section shall set forth the information contained on the application of the charitable organization that the attorney general determines is relevant, including, but not limited to, the location at which the organization will conduct bingo, whether the license is a type I, type II, or type III license, and the days of the week and the times on each of those days when bingo will be conducted. If the attorney general refuses to grant, places limits, restrictions, or probationary conditions on, or revokes or suspends a license, the attorney general shall notify the applicant in writing and specifically identify the reason for the refusal, revocation, limit, restriction, probationary condition, or suspension in narrative form and, if applicable, by identifying the section of the Revised Code violated. The failure of the attorney general to give the written notice of the reasons for the refusal, revocation, limit, restriction, probationary condition, or suspension or a mistake in the written notice does not affect the validity of the attorney general's refusal to grant, or the revocation or suspension of, or limit, restriction, probationary condition on, a license. If the attorney general fails to give the written notice or if there is a mistake in the written notice, the applicant may bring an action to compel the attorney general to comply with this division or to correct the mistake, but the attorney general's order refusing to grant, or placing a limit, restriction, or probationary condition on, or revoking or suspending, a license shall not be enjoined during the pendency of the action. (J)(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (J)(2) of this section, a charitable organization that has been issued a license under this section but that cannot conduct bingo at the location, or on the day of the week or at the time, specified on the license due to circumstances that make it impractical to do so, or that desires to conduct instant bingo other than at a bingo session at additional locations not identified on the license, may apply in writing, together with an application fee of two hundred fifty dollars, to the attorney general, at least thirty days prior to a change in or addition of a location, day of the week, or time, and request an amended license. (b) As applicable, the application shall describe the causes making it impractical for the organization to conduct bingo in conformity with its license and shall indicate the location, days of the week, and times on each of those days when it desires to conduct bingo and, as applicable, shall indicate the additional locations at which it desires to conduct instant bingo other than at a bingo session. (c) Except as otherwise provided in division (J)(3) of this section, the attorney general shall issue the amended license in accordance with division (I) of this section, and the organization shall surrender its original license to the attorney general. (2)(a) A charitable organization that has been issued a license under this section to conduct electronic instant bingo but that cannot conduct electronic instant bingo at the location, or on the day of the week or at the time, specified on the license due to circumstances that make it impractical to do so, may apply in writing, together with an application fee of two hundred fifty dollars, to the attorney general, at least thirty days prior to a change in a location, day of the week, or time, and request an amended license. A charitable organization may not apply for an amended license to conduct electronic instant bingo at any additional location. (b) The application shall describe the causes making it impractical for the organization to conduct electronic instant bingo in conformity with its license and shall indicate the location, days of the week, and times on each of those days when it desires to conduct electronic instant bingo. (c) Except as otherwise provided in division (J)(3) of this section, the attorney general shall issue the amended license in accordance with division (I) of this section, and the organization shall surrender its original license to the attorney general. (3) The attorney general may refuse to grant an amended license under division (J)(1) or (2) of this section according to the terms of division (F) of this section. (K) The attorney general may enter into a written contract with any other state agency to delegate to that state agency the powers prescribed to the attorney general under Chapter 2915. of the Revised Code. (L) The attorney general, by rule adopted pursuant to section 111.15 of the Revised Code, may adopt rules to determine the requirements for a charitable organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code to be in good standing in the state. Sec. 2915.081. (A) No distributor shall sell, offer to sell, or otherwise provide or offer to provide bingo supplies to another person, or modify, convert, add to, or remove parts from bingo supplies to further their promotion or sale, for use in this state without having obtained a license from the attorney general under this section. (B)(1) The attorney general may issue a distributor license to any person that meets the requirements of this section. The application for the license shall be on a form prescribed by the attorney general and be accompanied by the annual fee prescribed by this section. The license is valid for a period of one year, and the annual fee for the license is five thousand dollars. (2) Upon applying for or renewing a license under this section, an applicant shall file with and have approved by the attorney general a bond in which the applicant shall be the principal obligor, in the sum of fifty thousand dollars, with one or more sureties authorized to do business in this state. The applicant shall maintain the bond in effect as long as the license is valid; however, the liability of the surety under the bond shall not exceed an all-time aggregate liability of fifty thousand dollars. The bond, which may be in the form of a rider to a larger blanket liability bond, shall run to the state and to any person who may have a cause of action against the principal obligor of the bond for any liability arising out of a violation by the obligor of any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted pursuant to this chapter. (C) The attorney general may refuse to issue a distributor license to any person to which any of the following applies, or to any person that has an officer, partner, or other person who has an ownership interest of ten per cent or more and to whom any of the following applies: (1) The person, officer, or partner has been convicted of a disqualifying offense as determined in accordance with section 9.79 of the Revised Code. (2) The person, officer, or partner has made an incorrect or false statement that is material to the granting of a license in an application submitted to the attorney general under this section or in a similar application submitted to a gambling licensing authority in another jurisdiction if the statement resulted in license revocation through administrative action in the other jurisdiction. (3) The person, officer, or partner has submitted any incorrect or false information relating to the application to the attorney general under this section, if the information is material to the granting of the license. (4) The person, officer, or partner has failed to correct any incorrect or false information that is material to the granting of the license in the records required to be maintained under division (F) of section 2915.10 of the Revised Code. (5) The person, officer, or partner has had a license related to gambling revoked or suspended under the laws of this state, another state, or the United States. (6) The attorney general has good cause to believe that a person, officer, or partner has committed a breach of fiduciary duty, theft, or other type of misconduct related to a charitable organization person that has obtained a bingo license issued under this chapter section 2915.08 of the Revised Code or an entity described in division (A)(1) of section 2915.16 of the Revised Code that conducts a raffle. (D) The (D)(1) Except as otherwise provided in divisions (D)(2) and (3) of this section, the attorney general shall not issue a distributor license to any person that is involved in the conduct of bingo on behalf of a charitable organization or that is a lessor of premises used for the conduct of bingo. This division (2) Division (D)(1) of this section does not prohibit a distributor from advising charitable organizations on the use and benefit of specific bingo supplies or prohibit a distributor from advising a customer on operational methods to improve bingo profitability. (3) Division (D)(1) of this section does not prohibit a distributor that operates an online raffle platform from conducting an online raffle on behalf of an entity described in division (A)(1) of section 2915.16 of the Revised Code. (E)(1) No distributor shall sell, offer to sell, or otherwise provide or offer to provide bingo supplies to any person, or modify, convert, add to, or remove parts from bingo supplies to further their promotion or sale, for use in this state except to or for the use of a charitable organization that has been issued a license under section 2915.08 of the Revised Code or an entity described in division (A)(1) of section 2915.16 of the Revised Code that conducts a raffle, or to another distributor that has been issued a license under this section. No distributor shall accept payment for the sale or other provision of bingo supplies other than by check or electronic fund transfer. (2) (2)(a) No distributor may donate, give, loan, lease, or otherwise provide any bingo supplies or equipment, or modify, convert, add to, or remove parts from bingo supplies to further their promotion or sale, to or for the use of a charitable organization for use in a bingo session conditioned on or in consideration for an exclusive right to provide bingo supplies to the charitable organization. A distributor may provide a licensed charitable organization with free samples of the distributor's products to be used as prizes or to be used for the purpose of sampling. (b) No distributor may donate, give, loan, lease, or otherwise provide any bingo supplies, or modify, convert, add to, or remove parts from bingo supplies to further their promotion or sale, to or for the use of an entity described in division (A)(1) of section 2915.16 of the Revised Code for use in a raffle conditioned on or in consideration for an exclusive right to provide bingo supplies to the entity. (3) No distributor shall purchase bingo supplies for use in this state from any person except from a manufacturer issued a license under section 2915.082 of the Revised Code or from another distributor issued a license under this section. Subject to division (D) of section 2915.082 of the Revised Code, no distributor shall pay for purchased bingo supplies other than by check or electronic fund transfer. (4) No (4)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (E)(4)(b) of this section, no distributor shall participate in the conduct of bingo on behalf of a charitable organization or have any direct or indirect ownership interest in a premises used for the conduct of bingo. (b) Division (E)(4)(a) of this section does not prohibit a distributor that operates an online raffle platform from conducting an online raffle on behalf of an entity described in division (A)(1) of section 2915.16 of the Revised Code. (5) No distributor shall knowingly solicit, offer, pay, or receive any kickback, bribe, or undocumented rebate, directly or indirectly, overtly or covertly, in cash or in kind, in return for providing bingo supplies to any person in this state. (6) No distributor shall knowingly provide or offer to provide an online raffle platform to any person for use in this state unless the platform has been approved under section 2915.19 of the Revised Code. (F)(1) No distributor shall knowingly sell, offer to sell, or otherwise provide or offer to provide an electronic instant bingo system to any person for use in this state, or install, maintain, update, or repair an electronic instant bingo system, without first obtaining an electronic instant bingo distributor endorsement to the person's distributor license issued under this section. An applicant for a distributor license under this section may apply simultaneously for an electronic instant bingo distributor endorsement to that license. (2) An applicant for an electronic instant bingo distributor endorsement shall submit the application on a form prescribed by the attorney general and shall submit one complete set of fingerprints directly to the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation for the purpose of conducting a criminal records check. The applicant shall provide the fingerprints using a method the superintendent prescribes pursuant to division (C)(2) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code and shall fill out the form the superintendent prescribes pursuant to division (C)(1) of that section. Upon receiving an application for an electronic instant bingo distributor endorsement, the attorney general shall request the superintendent, or a vendor approved by the bureau, to conduct a criminal records check based on the applicant's fingerprint impressions in accordance with division (A)(18) of that section. The applicant shall pay any fee required under division (C)(3) of that section. (3) The attorney general shall not issue an electronic instant bingo distributor endorsement to an applicant unless the attorney general has received the results of the criminal records check described in division (F)(2) of this section. The attorney general shall not issue an electronic instant bingo distributor endorsement to an applicant if the applicant, any officer or partner of the applicant, or any person who has an ownership interest of ten per cent or more in the applicant has violated any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted by the attorney general under this chapter or has violated any existing or former law or rule of this state, any other state, or the United States that is substantially equivalent to any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted by the attorney general under this chapter. (4) An electronic instant bingo distributor endorsement issued under this section shall be valid for the period of the underlying distributor license. (G) The attorney general may suspend, place limits, restrictions, or probationary conditions on, or revoke a distributor license or an electronic instant bingo distributor endorsement, for a limited or indefinite period of time at the attorney general's discretion, for any of the following reasons: (1) Any reason for which the attorney general may refuse to issue the license or endorsement; (2) The distributor holding the license or endorsement violates any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted by the attorney general under this chapter; (3) The distributor or any officer, partner, or other person who has an ownership interest of ten per cent or more in the distributor is convicted of either of the following: (a) A felony under the laws of this state, another state, or the United States; (b) Any gambling offense. (H) The attorney general may adopt rules for the application, acceptance, denial, suspension, revocation, limitation, restriction, or condition of a distributor license or endorsement, and to enforce any other provisions of this section, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (I) The attorney general may impose a civil fine on a distributor licensed or permitted under this chapter for failure to comply with any restrictions, limits, or probationary conditions on its license, or for failure to comply with this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter, according to a schedule of fines that the attorney general shall adopt in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (J) Whoever violates division (A), (E), or (F) of this section is guilty of illegally operating as a distributor. Except as otherwise provided in this division, illegally operating as a distributor is a misdemeanor of the first degree. If the offender previously has been convicted of a violation of division (A), (E), or (F) of this section, illegally operating as a distributor is a felony of the fifth degree. Sec. 2915.082. (A) No manufacturer shall sell, offer to sell, or otherwise provide or offer to provide bingo supplies for use in this state without having obtained a license from the attorney general under this section. (B)(1) The attorney general may issue a manufacturer license to any person that meets the requirements of this section. The application for the license shall be on a form prescribed by the attorney general and be accompanied by the annual fee prescribed by this section. The license is valid for a period of one year, and the annual fee for the license is five thousand dollars. (2) Upon applying for or renewing a license under this section, an applicant shall file with and have approved by the attorney general a bond in which the applicant shall be the principal obligor, in the sum of fifty thousand dollars, with one or more sureties authorized to do business in this state. The applicant shall maintain the bond in effect as long as the license is valid; however, the liability of the surety under the bond shall not exceed an all-time aggregate liability of fifty thousand dollars. The bond, which may be in the form of a rider to a larger blanket liability bond, shall run to the state and to any person who may have a cause of action against the principal obligor of the bond for any liability arising out of a violation by the obligor of any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted pursuant to this chapter. (C) The attorney general may refuse to issue a manufacturer license to any person to which any of the following applies, or to any person that has an officer, partner, or other person who has an ownership interest of ten per cent or more and to whom any of the following applies: (1) The person, officer, or partner has been convicted of a disqualifying offense as determined in accordance with section 9.79 of the Revised Code. (2) The person, officer, or partner has made an incorrect or false statement that is material to the granting of a license in an application submitted to the attorney general under this section or in a similar application submitted to a gambling licensing authority in another jurisdiction if the statement resulted in license revocation through administrative action in the other jurisdiction. (3) The person, officer, or partner has submitted any incorrect or false information relating to the application to the attorney general under this section, if the information is material to the granting of the license. (4) The person, officer, or partner has failed to correct any incorrect or false information that is material to the granting of the license in the records required to be maintained under division (G) of section 2915.10 of the Revised Code. (5) The person, officer, or partner has had a license related to gambling revoked or suspended under the laws of this state, another state, or the United States. (6) The attorney general has good cause to believe that the person, officer, or partner has committed a breach of fiduciary duty, theft, or other type of misconduct, related to a charitable organization person that has obtained a bingo license under this chapter section 2915.08 of the Revised Code or an entity described in division (A)(1) of section 2915.16 of the Revised Code that conducts a raffle. (D)(1) No manufacturer shall sell, offer to sell, or otherwise provide or offer to provide bingo supplies to any person for use in this state except to a distributor that has been issued a license under section 2915.081 of the Revised Code. No manufacturer shall accept payment for the sale of bingo supplies other than by check or electronic fund transfer. (2) No manufacturer shall knowingly solicit, offer, pay, or receive any kickback, bribe, or undocumented rebate, directly or indirectly, overtly or covertly, in cash or in kind, in return for providing bingo supplies to any person in this state. (E)(1) No manufacturer shall knowingly sell, offer to sell, or otherwise provide or offer to provide an electronic instant bingo system to any person for use in this state, or submit an electronic instant bingo system for testing and approval under section 2915.15 of the Revised Code, without first obtaining an electronic instant bingo manufacturer endorsement to the person's manufacturer license issued under this section. An applicant for a manufacturer license under this section may apply simultaneously for an electronic instant bingo manufacturer endorsement to that license. (2) A manufacturer licensed under this section may only sell, offer to sell, or otherwise provide or offer to provide electronic instant bingo systems that contain proprietary software owned by or licensed to the manufacturer. If the proprietary software is licensed to the manufacturer, the manufacturer shall provide a copy of the license along with the application for an endorsement under this section. (3) An applicant for an electronic instant bingo manufacturer endorsement shall submit the application on a form prescribed by the attorney general and shall submit one complete set of fingerprints directly to the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation for the purpose of conducting a criminal records check. The applicant shall provide the fingerprints using a method the superintendent prescribes pursuant to division (C)(2) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code and shall fill out the form the superintendent prescribes pursuant to division (C)(1) of that section. Upon receiving an application for an electronic instant bingo manufacturer endorsement, the attorney general shall request the superintendent, or a vendor approved by the bureau, to conduct a criminal records check based on the applicant's fingerprint impressions in accordance with division (A)(18) of that section. The applicant shall pay any fee required under division (C)(3) of that section. (4) The attorney general shall not issue an electronic instant bingo manufacturer endorsement to an applicant unless the attorney general has received the results of the criminal records check described in division (E)(3) of this section. The attorney general shall not issue an electronic instant bingo manufacturer endorsement to an applicant if the applicant, any officer or partner of the applicant, or any person who has an ownership interest of ten per cent or more in the applicant has violated any existing or former law or rule of this state, any other state, or the United States that is substantially equivalent to any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted by the attorney general under this chapter. (F)(1) The attorney general may suspend, place limits, restrictions, or probationary conditions on, or revoke a manufacturer license or an electronic instant bingo manufacturer endorsement for a limited or indefinite period of time for any of the following reasons: (a) Any reason for which the attorney general may refuse to issue the license or endorsement; (b) The manufacturer holding the license or endorsement violates any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted by the attorney general under this chapter; (c) The manufacturer or any officer, partner, or other person who has an ownership interest of ten per cent or more in the manufacturer is convicted of either of the following: (i) A felony under the laws of this state, another state, or the United States; (ii) Any gambling offense. (2) The attorney general may perform an onsite inspection of a manufacturer of bingo supplies that is selling, offering to sell, or otherwise providing or offering to provide bingo supplies or that is applying for a license to sell, offer to sell, or otherwise provide or offer to provide bingo supplies in this state. (3)(a) The attorney general shall establish by rule an application and renewal fee for an electronic instant bingo manufacturer endorsement in an amount sufficient to cover the costs the attorney general incurs in processing applications for electronic instant bingo manufacturer endorsements and investigating an applicant's suitability. (b) If the cost of processing a particular application and investigating the applicant's suitability exceeds the amount of the application and renewal fee, the attorney general may charge the applicant an additional fee as necessary to cover that cost. (c) The attorney general shall not issue an electronic instant bingo manufacturer endorsement unless the attorney general has received payment in full from the applicant for all fees to be charged under this section. (G) The attorney general may adopt rules for the application, acceptance, denial, suspension, revocation, limitation, restriction, or condition of a manufacturer license or endorsement described in this section, and to enforce any other provisions of this section, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (H) The attorney general may impose a civil fine on a manufacturer licensed or permitted under this chapter for failure to comply with any restrictions, limits, or probationary conditions on its license, and for failure to comply with this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter, according to a schedule of fines that the attorney general shall adopt in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (I) Whoever violates division (A), (D), or (E) of this section is guilty of illegally operating as a manufacturer. Except as otherwise provided in this division, illegally operating as a manufacturer is a misdemeanor of the first degree. If the offender previously has been convicted of a violation of division (A), (D), or (E) of this section, illegally operating as a manufacturer is a felony of the fifth degree. Sec. 2915.093. (A) As used in this section, "retail income from all commercial activity" means the income that a person receives from the provision of goods, services, or activities that are provided at the location where instant bingo other than at a bingo session is conducted, including the sale of instant bingo tickets. A religious organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, at not more than one location at which it conducts its charitable programs, may include donations from its members and guests as retail income. (B)(1) If a charitable instant bingo organization conducts instant bingo other than at a bingo session under a type III license issued under section 2915.08 of the Revised Code, the charitable instant bingo organization shall enter into a written contract with the owner or lessor of the location at which the instant bingo is conducted to allow the owner or lessor to assist in the conduct of instant bingo other than at a bingo session, identify each location where the instant bingo other than at a bingo session is being conducted, and identify the owner or lessor of each location. (2) A charitable instant bingo organization that conducts instant bingo other than at a bingo session under a type III license issued under section 2915.08 of the Revised Code is not required to enter into a written contract with the owner or lessor of the location at which the instant bingo is conducted, provided that the owner or lessor is not assisting in the conduct of the instant bingo other than at a bingo session and provided that the conduct of the instant bingo other than at a bingo session at that location is not more than five days per calendar year and not more than ten hours per day. (C) Except as provided in division (F) of this section, no charitable instant bingo organization shall conduct instant bingo other than at a bingo session at a location where the primary source of retail income from all commercial activity at that location is the sale of instant bingo tickets other than at a bingo session. (D) The owner or lessor of a location that enters into a contract pursuant to division (B) of this section shall pay the full gross profit to the charitable instant bingo organization, in return for the deal of instant bingo tickets. The owner or lessor may retain the money that the owner or lessor receives for selling the instant bingo tickets, provided, however, that after the deal has been sold, the owner or lessor shall pay to the charitable instant bingo organization the value of any unredeemed instant bingo prizes remaining in the deal of instant bingo tickets. The charitable instant bingo organization shall pay six per cent of the total gross receipts of any deal of instant bingo tickets for the purpose of reimbursing the owner or lessor for expenses described in this division. As used in this division, "expenses" means those items provided for in divisions (GG)(4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (12), and (13) of section 2915.01 of the Revised Code and that percentage of the owner's or lessor's rent for the location where instant bingo is conducted. "Expenses," in the aggregate, shall not exceed six per cent of the total gross receipts of any deal of instant bingo tickets. As used in this division, "full gross profit" means the amount by which the total receipts of all instant bingo tickets, if the deal had been sold in full, exceeds the amount that would be paid out if all prizes were redeemed. (E) A charitable instant bingo organization shall provide the attorney general with all of the following information: (1) That the charitable instant bingo organization has terminated a contract entered into pursuant to division (B) of this section with an owner or lessor of a location; (2) That the charitable instant bingo organization has entered into a written contract pursuant to division (B) of this section with a new owner or lessor of a location; (3) That the charitable instant bingo organization is aware of conduct by the owner or lessor of a location at which instant bingo is conducted that is in violation of this chapter. (F) Division (C) of this section does not apply to a volunteer firefighter's organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, that conducts instant bingo other than at a bingo session on the premises where the organization conducts firefighter training, that has conducted instant bingo continuously for at least five years prior to July 1, 2003, and that, during each of those five years, had gross receipts of at least one million five hundred thousand dollars. Sec. 2915.10. (A) No charitable organization entity that conducts bingo or a game of chance pursuant to division (D) of section 2915.02 of the Revised Code shall fail to maintain the following records for at least three years from the date on which the bingo or game of chance is conducted: (1) An itemized list of the gross receipts of each bingo session, each game of instant bingo by serial number, each electronic instant bingo game by serial number, each raffle, each punch board game, and each game of chance, and an itemized list of the gross profits of each game of instant bingo by serial number and each electronic instant bingo game by serial number; (2) An itemized list of all expenses, other than prizes, that are incurred in conducting bingo, the name of each person to whom the expenses are paid, and a receipt for all of the expenses; (3) A list of all prizes awarded during each bingo session, each raffle, each punch board game, and each game of chance conducted by the charitable organization, the total prizes awarded from each game of instant bingo by serial number and each electronic instant bingo game by serial number, and the name, address, and social security number of all persons who are winners of prizes of six hundred dollars or more in value; (4) An itemized list of the recipients of the net profit of the bingo or game of chance, including the name and address of each recipient to whom the money is distributed, and if the organization uses the net profit of bingo, or the money or assets received from a game of chance, for any charitable or other purpose set forth in division (V) of section 2915.01, division (D) of section 2915.02, or section 2915.101 of the Revised Code, a list of each purpose and an itemized list of each expenditure for each purpose; (5) The number of persons who participate in any bingo session, raffle, or game of chance that is conducted by the charitable organization; (6) A list of receipts from the sale of food and beverages by the charitable organization entity or one of its auxiliary units or societies, if the receipts were excluded from gross receipts under division (T) of section 2915.01 of the Revised Code; (7) An itemized list of all expenses incurred at each bingo session, each raffle, each punch board game, or each game of instant bingo or electronic instant bingo conducted by the charitable organization in the sale of food and beverages by the charitable organization entity or by an auxiliary unit or society of the charitable organization entity, the name of each person to whom the expenses are paid, and a receipt for all of the expenses. (B) A charitable organization An entity shall keep the records that it is required to maintain pursuant to division (A) of this section at its principal place of business in this state or at its headquarters in this state and shall notify the attorney general of the location at which those records are kept. (C) The gross profit from each bingo session or game described in division (O)(1) or (2) of section 2915.01 of the Revised Code shall be deposited into a checking account devoted exclusively to the bingo session or game. Payments for allowable expenses incurred in conducting the bingo session or game and payments to recipients of some or all of the net profit of the bingo session or game shall be made only by checks or electronic fund transfers drawn on the bingo session or game account. (D) Each charitable organization shall conduct and record an inventory of all of its bingo supplies as of the first day of November of each year. (E) The attorney general may adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that establish standards of accounting, record keeping, and reporting to ensure that gross receipts from bingo or games of chance are properly accounted for. (F) A distributor shall maintain, for a period of three years after the date of its sale or other provision, a record of each instance of its selling or otherwise providing to another person bingo supplies for use in this state. The record shall include all of the following for each instance: (1) The name of the manufacturer from which the distributor purchased the bingo supplies and the date of the purchase; (2) The name and address of the charitable organization or other distributor to which the bingo supplies were sold or otherwise provided; (3) A description that clearly identifies the bingo supplies; (4) Invoices that include the nonrepeating serial numbers of all paper bingo cards and sheets and all instant bingo deals sold or otherwise provided to each charitable organization. (G) A manufacturer shall maintain, for a period of three years after the date of its sale or other provision, a record of each instance of its selling or otherwise providing bingo supplies for use in this state. The record shall include all of the following for each instance: (1) The name and address of the distributor to whom the bingo supplies were sold or otherwise provided; (2) A description that clearly identifies the bingo supplies, including serial numbers; (3) Invoices that include the nonrepeating serial numbers of all paper bingo cards and sheets and all instant bingo deals sold or otherwise provided to each distributor. (H) The attorney general or any law enforcement agency may do all of the following: (1) Investigate any charitable organization, entity described in division (A)(1) of section 2915.16 of the Revised Code, distributor, or manufacturer or any officer, agent, trustee, member, or employee of the organization, entity, distributor, or manufacturer; (2) Examine the accounts and records of the charitable organization, entity described in division (A)(1) of section 2915.16 of the Revised Code, distributor, or manufacturer or of any officer, agent, trustee, member, or employee of the organization, distributor, or manufacturer; (3) Conduct inspections, audits, and observations of bingo or games of chance; (4) Conduct inspections of the premises where bingo or games of chance are conducted or where bingo supplies are manufactured or distributed; (5) Take any other necessary and reasonable action to determine if a violation of any provision of this chapter has occurred and to determine whether section 2915.11 of the Revised Code has been complied with. If any law enforcement agency has reasonable grounds to believe that a charitable organization, entity described in division (A)(1) of section 2915.16 of the Revised Code, distributor, or manufacturer or an officer, agent, trustee, member, or employee of the organization, entity, distributor, or manufacturer has violated any provision of this chapter, the law enforcement agency may proceed by action in the proper court to enforce this chapter, provided that the law enforcement agency shall give written notice to the attorney general when commencing an action as described in this division. (I) No person shall destroy, alter, conceal, withhold, or deny access to any accounts or records of a charitable organization, entity described in division (A)(1) of section 2915.16 of the Revised Code, distributor, or manufacturer that have been requested for examination, or obstruct, impede, or interfere with any inspection, audit, or observation of bingo or a game of chance, of premises where bingo or a game of chance is conducted, or of premises where bingo supplies are manufactured or distributed, or refuse to comply with any reasonable request of, or obstruct, impede, or interfere with any other reasonable action undertaken by, the attorney general or a law enforcement agency pursuant to division (H) of this section. (J) Whoever violates division (A) or (I) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. Sec. 2915.101. Except as otherwise provided by law, a charitable organization that conducts instant bingo or electronic instant bingo, or an entity described in division (A)(1)(c) of section 2915.16 of the Revised Code that conducts an online raffle, shall distribute the net profit from the proceeds of the sale of instant bingo or , electronic instant bingo, or online raffles as follows: (A)(1) If a veteran's organization, a fraternal organization, or a sporting organization or an entity described in division (A)(1)(c) of section 2915.16 of the Revised Code conducted the instant bingo or , electronic instant bingo, or online raffles, the organization or entity shall distribute the net profit from the proceeds of the sale of instant bingo or, electronic instant bingo, or online raffles as follows: (a) For the first two hundred fifty thousand dollars, or a greater amount prescribed by the attorney general to adjust for changes in prices as measured by the consumer price index as defined in section 325.18 of the Revised Code and other factors affecting the organization's or entity's expenses, as defined in division (GG) of section 2915.01 of the Revised Code, or less of net profit from the proceeds of the sale of instant bingo or , electronic instant bingo, or online raffles generated in a calendar year: (i) At least twenty-five per cent shall be distributed to an organization described in division (V)(1) of section 2915.01 of the Revised Code or to a department or agency of the federal government, the state, or any political subdivision. (ii) Not more than seventy-five per cent may be deducted and retained by the organization or entity for reimbursement of or for the organization's or entity's expenses, as defined in division (GG) of section 2915.01 of the Revised Code, in conducting the instant bingo or , electronic instant bingo game, or online raffles. (b) For any net profit from the proceeds of the sale of instant bingo or , electronic instant bingo, or online raffles of more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars or an adjusted amount generated in a calendar year: (i) A minimum of fifty per cent shall be distributed to an organization described in division (V)(1) of section 2915.01 of the Revised Code or to a department or agency of the federal government, the state, or any political subdivision. (ii) Five per cent may be distributed for the organization's or entity's own charitable purposes or to a community action agency. (iii) Forty-five per cent may be deducted and retained by the organization or entity for reimbursement of or for the organization's or entity's expenses, as defined in division (GG) of section 2915.01 of the Revised Code, in conducting the instant bingo or , electronic instant bingo game, or online raffle. (2) If a veteran's organization, a fraternal organization, or a sporting organization or an entity described in division (A)(1)(c) of section 2915.16 of the Revised Code does not distribute the full percentages specified in divisions (A)(1)(a) and (b) of this section for the purposes specified in those divisions, the organization or entity shall distribute the balance of the net profit from the proceeds of the sale of instant bingo or , electronic instant bingo, or online raffles not distributed or retained for those purposes to an organization described in division (V)(1) of section 2915.01 of the Revised Code. (B) If a charitable organization other than a veteran's organization, a fraternal organization, or a sporting organization conducted the conducts instant bingo or electronic instant bingo, the organization shall distribute one hundred per cent of the net profit from the proceeds of the sale of instant bingo or electronic instant bingo to an organization described in division (V)(1) of section 2915.01 of the Revised Code or to a department or agency of the federal government, the state, or any political subdivision. (C) Nothing in this section prohibits a veteran's organization, a fraternal organization, or a sporting organization or an entity described in division (A)(1)(c) of section 2915.16 of the Revised Code from distributing any net profit from the proceeds of the sale of instant bingo or , electronic instant bingo, or online raffles to an organization that is described in subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code when the organization that is described in subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code is one that makes donations to other organizations and permits donors to advise or direct such donations so long as the donations comply with requirements established in or pursuant to subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. Sec. 2915.14. (A) No charitable organization shall conduct electronic instant bingo unless all of the following are true: (1) The organization is a veteran's organization described in division (J) of section 2915.01 of the Revised Code, or is a fraternal organization described in division (L) of section 2915.01 of the Revised Code, and the organization qualified as a veteran's organization or fraternal organization, as applicable, on or before June 30, 2021. (2) The organization is a veteran's organization described in subsection 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code or is, and has received from the internal revenue service a determination letter that is currently in effect stating that the organization is, exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(a), and is described in subsection 501(c)(7), 501(c)(8), 501(c)(10), or 501(c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code. (3) The organization has not conducted a raffle in violation of division (B) of section 2915.092 of the Revised Code, as that section existed immediately before the effective date of this amendment, or in violation of section 2915.20 of the Revised Code, using an electronic raffle machine, as described in Ohio Veterans and Fraternal Charitable Coalition v. DeWine, Case No. 13-CV-13610 (C.P. Franklin Co. February 23, 2018), at any time on or after January 1, 2022. (B) No charitable organization that conducts electronic instant bingo shall do any of the following: (1) Possess an electronic instant bingo system that was not obtained in accordance with this chapter or with any rule adopted under this chapter; (2) Conduct electronic instant bingo on any day, at any time, or on any premises not specified on the organization's type II or type III license issued under section 2915.08 of the Revised Code; (3) Hold more than one valid license to conduct electronic instant bingo at any one time; (4) Conduct electronic instant bingo on more than one premises or on any premises other than the charitable organization's principal place of business; (5) Operate more than ten electronic bingo systems at the premises on which the charitable organization conducts electronic instant bingo under its license; (6) Fail to display both of the following conspicuously at the premises on which the charitable organization conducts electronic instant bingo: (a) The charitable organization's bingo license; (b) The serial number of each deal of electronic instant bingo tickets being sold. (7) Permit any person the charitable organization knows, or should have known, to be under eighteen years of age to play electronic instant bingo; (8) Sell or provide to any person an electronic instant bingo ticket for a price different from the price displayed on the game flare for that deal, except that the charitable organization may give a participant who wins an electronic instant bingo game an electronic instant bingo ticket as a prize in place of a cash prize; (9) Fail, once an electronic instant bingo deal is begun, to continue to sell tickets in that deal until all prizes have been awarded; (10) Permit any person whom the organization knows, or should have known, has been convicted of a felony or gambling offense in any jurisdiction to be a bingo game operator in the conduct of electronic instant bingo; (11) Permit a bingo game operator to play electronic instant bingo; (12)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(12)(b) of this section, pay compensation to a bingo game operator for conducting electronic instant bingo. (b) Division (B)(12)(a) of this section does not prohibit an employee of a veteran's organization or fraternal organization from redeeming electronic instant bingo tickets or vouchers for the organization's members or invited guests, so long as no portion of the employee's compensation is paid from any bingo receipts. (13) Pay consulting fees to any person in relation to electronic instant bingo. (C) No person shall sell, offer to sell, or otherwise provide or offer to provide an electronic instant bingo system to any person for use in this state unless the electronic instant bingo system has been approved under section 2915.15 of the Revised Code. (D) The attorney general shall adopt rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to ensure the integrity of electronic instant bingo, including, but not limited to, rules governing all of the following: (1) The requirements to receive a license or endorsement to conduct electronic instant bingo; (2) The location and number of electronic instant bingo systems in use, which shall not exceed ten at the single licensed location per organization; (3) The times when electronic instant bingo may be offered; (4) Signage requirements in facilities where electronic instant bingo is offered; (5) Electronic instant bingo device and system specifications, including reveal features and game themes; (6) Procedures and standards for the review, approval, inspection, and monitoring of electronic instant bingo systems, as described in section 2915.15 of the Revised Code; (7) Procedures and standards for the review and approval of any changes to technology, systems, or games licensed or permitted under this chapter; (8) The fees to be charged under section 2915.15 of the Revised Code for review, approval, inspection, and monitoring of electronic instant bingo systems; (9) Procedures allowing the attorney general to seek a summary suspension of a license to conduct electronic instant bingo or a license to manufacture or distribute electronic instant bingo systems if the attorney general has good cause to believe that the person or organization licensed to conduct electronic instant bingo, or the person or organization licensed to manufacture or distribute electronic instant bingo systems, or any of the organization's employees, officers, directors, agents, representatives, or partners, has violated this chapter or a rule adopted under this chapter. (E) Whoever knowingly violates division (A), (B), or (C) of this section or a rule adopted under division (D) of this section is guilty of illegal electronic instant bingo conduct. Illegal electronic instant bingo conduct is a misdemeanor of the first degree, except that if the offender previously has been convicted of a violation of division (A) or (B) of this section or of a rule adopted under division (D) of this section, illegal instant bingo conduct is a felony of the fifth degree. Sec. 2915.092 2915.16. (A)(1) Subject to division (A)(2) of this section, a person or entity Any of the following entities may conduct a raffle to raise money for the person or entity and does not need a license to conduct bingo in order to conduct a raffle drawing that is not for profit if the person or entity is any of the following: (a) Exempt An entity that is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; (b) A school district, community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code, or chartered nonpublic school; (c) Exempt An entity that is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 501(c)(4), 501(c)(6), 501(c)(7), 501(c)(8), 501(c)(10), or 501(c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code. (2) If a person or An entity that is described in division (A)(1)(c) of this section that conducts a traditional raffle, the person or entity shall distribute at least fifty per cent of the net profit from the raffle to a charitable purpose described in division (V) of section 2915.01 of the Revised Code or to a department or agency of the federal government, the state, or any political subdivision. (3) An entity described in division (A)(1)(c) of this section that conducts an online raffle shall distribute the net profit from the proceeds of the sale of the online raffle in accordance with section 2915.101 of the Revised Code. (B) Except as provided (B)(1) An entity described in division (A) (A)(1) of this section, no person shall conduct a raffle drawing that is for profit or a raffle drawing that is not for profit is not required to have a license issued under this chapter or to register under this chapter in order to conduct a traditional raffle to raise money for the entity. (2) All of the following apply with respect to a traditional raffle conducted under this section: (a) The entity conducting the raffle may accept electronic payment from a participant for a ticket and may sell a ticket to a participant over the internet or by other remote means, so long as the entity conducting the raffle delivers the physical ticket, an image of the physical ticket, or a message containing the unique identifier associated with the physical ticket to the participant before the drawing is held. (b) A participant is not required to be physically present at the drawing to win a prize. (c) The entity conducting the raffle may award a raffle prize in the form of an item of tangible personal property, cash, or a cash equivalent, including a gift card or other prepaid or stored value card. (d) If any prize is in the form of cash or a cash equivalent, the entity conducting the raffle shall hold the drawing at an event at which participants are invited to be physically present. (C) Whoever violates division (B) of this section is guilty of illegal conduct of a raffle. Except as otherwise provided in this division, illegal conduct of a raffle is a misdemeanor of the first degree. If the offender previously has been convicted of a violation of (C)(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (C)(1)(b) of this section, an entity described in division (B) (A)(1) of this section, illegal conduct of a raffle is a felony of the fifth degree shall register with the attorney general under section 2915.17 of the Revised Code before conducting an online raffle to raise money for the person. (b) An entity described in division (A)(1) of this section that had two hundred fifty thousand dollars or more in gross receipts from the conduct of online raffles in the previous calendar year shall obtain an online raffle license under section 2915.18 of the Revised Code before conducting an online raffle instead of registering under section 2915.17 of the Revised Code. (2) All of the following apply with respect to an online raffle conducted under this section: (a) The entity conducting the raffle shall use an online raffle platform that is approved by the attorney general under section 2915.19 of the Revised Code. (b) The entity conducting the raffle shall conduct the drawing at least twenty-four hours after the last ticket is sold for that drawing. (c) A participant in an online raffle is not required to be physically present at the drawing to win a prize. (d) The entity conducting the raffle may award a raffle prize only in the form of an item of tangible personal property. The entity conducting the raffle shall not do either of the following: (i) Award any prize in the form of cash or a cash equivalent, including a gift card or other prepaid or stored value card; (ii) Purchase any item of tangible personal property awarded to a participant as a prize from the participant and give the participant cash or a cash equivalent in exchange for the item. (e) The entity conducting the raffle shall not use any online raffle platform that incorporates an entertainment theme that resembles a slot machine, such as spinning reels or wheels. (f) Each participant in the raffle shall be at least eighteen years of age and a resident of this state. Before delivering a prize to a participant, the entity conducting the raffle shall require the participant to present evidence of the participant's age and residence. Sec. 2915.17. (A)(1) An entity described in division (A)(1) of section 2915.16 of the Revised Code that desires to conduct an online raffle and that did not have two hundred fifty thousand dollars or more in gross receipts from the conduct of online raffles in the previous calendar year shall register with the attorney general under this section before doing so. (2) An initial or renewed raffle registration is valid for one year. A registrant shall renew the registrant's registration in the same manner as the registrant submitted the registrant's initial registration. (3) At the time of an initial or renewed registration, the registrant shall pay the attorney general a fee of one hundred dollars. (B) The registration shall be on a form prescribed by the attorney general, shall be signed and sworn to by the registrant, and shall contain all of the following: (1) The name and post office address of the registrant; (2) A statement that the registrant is an entity described in division (A)(1) of section 2915.16 of the Revised Code; (3) In the case of a registrant who has not previously submitted a registration under this section, a statement of the registrant's previous history, record, and association that is sufficient to establish that the registrant is an entity described in division (A)(1) of section 2915.16 of the Revised Code, including, if applicable, a copy of a determination letter issued by the Internal Revenue Service; (4) Identification of each online raffle platform the registrant intends to use. If the registrant later wishes to use a different online raffle platform, the registrant shall submit a notice to the attorney general, on a form prescribed by the attorney general, identifying the online raffle platform before the registrant uses it. (5) In the case of an entity described in division (A)(1)(c) of section 2915.16 of the Revised Code, an affirmation that the net profit from each raffle will be distributed in accordance with division (A)(3) of that section and a statement of how the net profit will be distributed; (6) An estimate of the registrant's expected gross receipts for the calendar year from the sale of raffle tickets; (7) A statement that the registrant maintains all required records of its raffles under section 2915.10 of the Revised Code and the location at which those records are kept; (8) If the registrant is a charitable trust as defined in section 109.23 of the Revised Code, a statement as to whether it has registered with the attorney general pursuant to section 109.26 of the Revised Code or filed annual reports pursuant to section 109.31 of the Revised Code, and, if it is not required to do either, the exemption in section 109.26 or 109.31 of the Revised Code that applies to it; (9) If the registrant is a charitable organization as defined in section 1716.01 of the Revised Code, a statement as to whether it has filed with the attorney general a registration statement pursuant to section 1716.02 of the Revised Code and a financial report pursuant to section 1716.04 of the Revised Code, and, if it is not required to do both, the exemption in section 1716.03 of the Revised Code that applies to it; (10) In the case of a registrant seeking to qualify as a youth athletic park organization, a statement issued by a board or body vested with authority under Chapter 755. of the Revised Code for the supervision and maintenance of recreation facilities in the territory in which the organization is located, certifying that the playing fields owned by the organization were open for use to all residents of that territory, regardless of race, color, creed, religion, sex, or national origin, for athletic activities by youth athletic organizations that do not discriminate on the basis of race, color, creed, religion, sex, or national origin, and that the fields were not used for any profit-making activity at any time during the year. That type of board or body is authorized to issue the statement upon request and shall issue the statement if it finds that the applicant's playing fields were so used. (11) Other necessary and reasonable information that the attorney general may require by rule adopted pursuant to section 111.15 of the Revised Code. (C) As soon as practicable after receiving a raffle registration under this section, the attorney general shall issue the registrant a statement of registration that includes the period of validity and any other information the attorney general determines is necessary. Sec. 2915.18. (A)(1) An entity described in division (A)(1) of section 2915.16 of the Revised Code that desires to conduct an online raffle during a calendar year and that had two hundred fifty thousand dollars or more in gross receipts from the conduct of online raffles in the previous calendar year shall apply to the attorney general for an online raffle license before the first day of January of the year in which the online raffle is to be conducted. (2) An initial or renewed online raffle license is valid for one year. An applicant shall apply for a renewed license in the same manner as for an initial license. (3) An application for an initial or renewed online raffle license shall be accompanied by a fee in an amount equal to the fee the applicant would be required to pay when applying for a bingo license under division (B) of section 2915.08 of the Revised Code. (B) Subject to division (H) of this section, an application for an online raffle license shall be on a form prescribed by the attorney general, shall be signed and sworn to by the applicant, and shall contain all of the following: (1) The name and post office address of the applicant; (2) A statement that the applicant is an entity described in division (A)(1) of section 2915.16 of the Revised Code; (3) In the case of an application for an initial online raffle license, a statement of the applicant's previous history, record, and association that is sufficient to establish that the applicant is an entity described in division (A)(1) of section 2915.16 of the Revised Code, including, if applicable, a copy of a determination letter issued by the internal revenue service; (4) Identification of each online raffle platform the applicant intends to use. If the license is granted and the applicant later wishes to use a different online raffle platform, the applicant shall submit a notice to the attorney general, on a form prescribed by the attorney general, identifying the online raffle platform before the applicant uses it. (5) A statement as to whether the applicant has ever had any previous application refused under this chapter, whether it previously has had a license revoked or suspended under this chapter, and the reason stated by the attorney general for the refusal, revocation, or suspension; (6) In the case of an entity described in division (A)(1)(c) of section 2915.16 of the Revised Code, an affirmation that the net profit from the proceeds of the online raffles will be distributed in accordance with section 2915.101 of the Revised Code and a statement of how the net profit will be distributed; (7) A statement that the applicant maintains all required records of its raffles under section 2915.10 of the Revised Code and the location at which those records are kept; (8) If the applicant is a charitable trust as defined in section 109.23 of the Revised Code, a statement as to whether it has registered with the attorney general pursuant to section 109.26 of the Revised Code or filed annual reports pursuant to section 109.31 of the Revised Code, and, if it is not required to do either, the exemption in section 109.26 or 109.31 of the Revised Code that applies to it; (9) If the applicant is a charitable organization as defined in section 1716.01 of the Revised Code, a statement as to whether it has filed with the attorney general a registration statement pursuant to section 1716.02 of the Revised Code and a financial report pursuant to section 1716.04 of the Revised Code, and, if it is not required to do both, the exemption in section 1716.03 of the Revised Code that applies to it; (10) In the case of an applicant seeking to qualify as a youth athletic park organization, a statement issued by a board or body vested with authority under Chapter 755. of the Revised Code for the supervision and maintenance of recreation facilities in the territory in which the organization is located, certifying that the playing fields owned by the organization were open for use to all residents of that territory, regardless of race, color, creed, religion, sex, or national origin, for athletic activities by youth athletic organizations that do not discriminate on the basis of race, color, creed, religion, sex, or national origin, and that the fields were not used for any profit-making activity at any time during the year. That type of board or body is authorized to issue the statement upon request and shall issue the statement if it finds that the applicant's playing fields were so used. (11) Other necessary and reasonable information that the attorney general may require by rule adopted pursuant to section 111.15 of the Revised Code. (C) As soon as practicable after receiving an application for an initial or renewed online raffle license, the attorney general shall conduct a preliminary review of the application and notify the applicant regarding any deficiencies. Not later than thirty days after the attorney general receives a completed application, or not later than thirty days after the application is submitted if the attorney general does not notify the applicant of any deficiency, the attorney general shall grant, grant with limits, restrictions, or probationary conditions, or deny the application based on findings established and communicated in accordance with this section. As an option to granting, granting with limits, restrictions, or probationary conditions, or denying an initial license application, the attorney general may grant a temporary license and request additional time to conduct the investigation if the attorney general has cause to believe that additional time is necessary to complete the investigation and has notified the applicant in writing about the specific concerns raised during the investigation. (D)(1) If any of the following applies to an entity, the attorney general may refuse to grant an online raffle license to the entity, may revoke or suspend the entity's online raffle license, or may place limits, restrictions, or probationary conditions on the entity's online raffle license for a limited or indefinite period, as determined by the attorney general: (a) The entity fails or has failed at any time to meet any requirement of this chapter, of section 109.26, 109.31, or 1716.02 of the Revised Code, or of any rule adopted by the attorney general pursuant to this chapter. (b) The entity makes or has made an incorrect or false statement that is material to the granting of the license in an application filed under this section. (c) The entity submits or has submitted any incorrect or false information relating to an application if the information is material to the granting of the license. (d) The entity maintains or has maintained any incorrect or false information that is material to the granting of the license in the records required to be kept pursuant to section 2915.10 of the Revised Code, if applicable. (e) The attorney general has good cause to believe that the entity will not conduct online raffles in accordance with this chapter or with any rule adopted by the attorney general pursuant to this chapter. (2) If the attorney general has good cause to believe that any director or officer of the entity has breached the director's or officer's fiduciary duty to, or committed theft or any other type of misconduct related to, the entity or any other entity that has been issued an online raffle license under this chapter, the attorney general may refuse to grant a license to the entity, may impose limits, restrictions, or probationary conditions on the license, or may revoke or suspend the entity's license for a period not to exceed five years. (3) The attorney general may impose a civil fine on an entity licensed under this section for failure to comply with any restrictions, limits, or probationary conditions on its license, and for failure to comply with this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter, according to a schedule of fines that the attorney general shall adopt in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (4) For the purposes of division (D) of this section, any action of an officer, trustee, agent, or representative of an entity is an action of the entity. (E) The attorney general shall send notice of any of the following actions in writing to the prosecuting attorney and sheriff of the county in which the entity is located and to any other law enforcement agency in that county that so requests, of all of the following: (1) The issuance of a license under this section; (2) The issuance of an amended license under this section; (3) The rejection of an application for and refusal to grant a license under this section; (4) The revocation of any license previously issued under this section; (5) The suspension of any license previously issued under this section; (6) The placing of any limits, restrictions, or probationary conditions placed on a license issued under this section. (F) A license issued by the attorney general under this section shall set forth the information contained on the entity's application that the attorney general determines is relevant. (G) If the attorney general refuses to grant, places limits, restrictions, or probationary conditions on, or revokes or suspends a license, the attorney general shall notify the entity in writing and specifically identify the reason for the refusal, revocation, limit, restriction, probationary condition, or suspension in narrative form and, if applicable, by identifying the section of the Revised Code violated. The failure of the attorney general to give the written notice of the reasons for the refusal, revocation, limit, restriction, probationary condition, or suspension or a mistake in the written notice does not affect the validity of the attorney general's refusal to grant, or the revocation or suspension of, or limit, restriction, probationary condition on, a license. If the attorney general fails to give the written notice or if there is a mistake in the written notice, the entity may bring an action to compel the attorney general to comply with this division or to correct the mistake, but the attorney general's order refusing to grant, or placing a limit, restriction, or probationary condition on, or revoking or suspending, a license shall not be enjoined during the pendency of the action. (H) A charitable organization that applies for an online raffle license under this section at the same time as the organization applies for a bingo license under section 2915.08 of the Revised Code is not required to submit any information or documentation with its application for an online raffle license that is the same as the information or documentation the organization is required to submit with its application for a bingo license. The attorney general shall prescribe a combined application form for a bingo license and an online raffle license in order to carry out the purposes of this division. Sec. 2915.19. (A)(1) Before permitting an online raffle platform to be used to conduct an online raffle, the distributor or manufacturer of an online raffle platform shall submit the platform, along with any associated equipment or software used to operate, manage, monitor, or document any aspect of an online raffle, to an independent testing laboratory that is approved by the attorney general for testing and evaluation to determine whether the platform and associated equipment or software meet the requirements of this chapter and of rules adopted under this chapter. The distributor or manufacturer shall pay all costs of that testing and evaluation. (2) If the independent testing laboratory certifies that the online raffle platform and associated equipment or software meet the requirements of this chapter and of rules adopted under this chapter, the distributor or manufacturer may submit the platform and associated equipment or software, along with a copy of the laboratory's certification and a fee established by the attorney general by rule under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, to the attorney general for review and approval. (3) The attorney general shall approve the online raffle platform for use in this state if the attorney general determines that the platform meets the requirements of this chapter and of the rules adopted under this chapter. The rules shall include a requirement that the online raffle platform require each participant to affirm that the participant is at least eighteen years of age and a resident of this state before completing the sale of an online raffle ticket through the platform. (B) The distributor of an approved online raffle platform promptly shall notify the attorney general of any planned significant change to the operation of the platform, as defined by the attorney general by rule. Before any such significant change takes effect, the attorney general may order that the distributor resubmit the platform, along with any associated equipment or software, to an independent testing laboratory under division (A) of this section as a condition of continued approval of the platform. (C) The attorney general may inspect an approved online raffle platform and any associated equipment or software at any time to ensure that the platform is in compliance with this chapter and with the rules adopted under this chapter. If the attorney general determines that any person or any online raffle platform is in violation of any provision of this chapter or of any rule adopted under this chapter, the attorney general may order that the violation immediately cease and may revoke the approval of the platform. (D) The attorney general may establish by rule adopted under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code an annual fee to be paid by the distributors of online raffle platforms in order to pay the cost of monitoring and inspecting the platforms under this section. Sec. 2915.20. (A) Except as permitted under section 2915.16 of the Revised Code, no person or entity shall knowingly conduct a raffle that is for profit or a raffle that is not for profit. (B)(1) No entity that conducts an online raffle shall knowingly fail to use an online raffle platform that is approved by the attorney general under section 2915.19 of the Revised Code. (2) No entity that conducts an online raffle and that had less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars in gross receipts from the conduct of online raffles in the previous calendar year shall knowingly fail to register under section 2915.17 of the Revised Code. (3) No entity that conducts an online raffle and that had two hundred fifty thousand dollars or more in gross receipts from the conduct of online raffles in the previous calendar year shall knowingly fail to have a current and valid online raffle license issued under section 2915.18 of the Revised Code. (4) No entity described in division (A)(1)(c) of section 2915.16 of the Revised Code shall knowingly fail to distribute the net profit from the proceeds of an online raffle in accordance with division (A)(3) of that section. (5) No entity that conducts an online raffle shall knowingly purchase any item of tangible personal property awarded to a participant as a prize from the participant and give the participant cash or a cash equivalent in exchange for the item. (6) No entity that conducts an online raffle shall permit an individual the entity knows, or should have known, to be under eighteen years of age or not to be a resident of this state to participate in the raffle. (C) Whoever violates this section is guilty of illegal conduct of a raffle. Except as otherwise provided in this division, illegal conduct of a raffle is a misdemeanor of the first degree. If the offender previously has been convicted of a violation of this section, illegal conduct of a raffle is a felony of the fifth degree. Section 2. That existing sections 109.32, 2915.01, 2915.07, 2915.08, 2915.081, 2915.082, 2915.092, 2915.093, 2915.10, 2915.101, and 2915.14 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. The requirements of sections 2915.101 and 2915.092 (2915.16) of the Revised Code, as amended by this act, apply only to gross receipts from online raffles conducted on or after the effective date of this section. Section 4. This act is hereby declared to be an emergency measure necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety. The reason for such necessity is to ensure that charitable organizations are able to continue raising necessary funds for their operations. Therefore, this act shall go into immediate effect.